src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_BIOLOGIA
! biologia:biologia
!! * Yaml: **N-biologia**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;
: A_DER/LAZH ;

LEXICON N_BUKVA
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_BUKVA ;
LEXICON NMN_BUKVA
! bukva:bukva
!! * Yaml: **N-bukva**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: bukvaaʹje
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: bukva
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen

 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;


LEXICON N_MERJA
!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_MERJA ;
LEXICON NMN_MERJA
! merja:merja
!! * Yaml: **N-merja**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: merjaaʹje
:%^RmVow%>že SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: merjže
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: merja
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

LEXICON N_TRUUBA
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_IN_A ;
LEXICON NMN_TRUUBA
 NMN_IN_A ;
LEXICON NMN_IN_A !! for nominals ending in single vowel that is -a, Liettua, but not -ia
! truuba:truuba
!! * Yaml: **N-truuba**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; 	!!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill
 SG-ILL ; 	!!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

!LEXICON N_TERHI
!!! inflection_type="?"
!: NMN_TERHI ;
LEXICON NMN_TERHI
! terhi:terhi
!! * Yaml: **Prop-terhi**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: terhiiʹje
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ʹžže SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: terhiʹžže
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

LEXICON N_JOUSTE
!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_JOUSTE ;
LEXICON NMN_JOUSTE
! jouste:jouste
!! * Yaml: **Prop-jouste**
 SG-NOM ;  !!= * @CODE@ +Sg+Nom
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Gen
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: jousteeʹje
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: jouste
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ʹžže SG-ILL ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Ill: jousteʹžže
 SG-LOC ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Loc
 SG-COM_IN ; !!= * @CODE@	+Sg+Com
 ESS/PAR ;   !!= * @CODE@	+Ess
 PL-NOM ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Nom
 PL-OBL ;    !!= * @CODE@	+Pl+Gen
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

LEXICON N_RADIO !!= * @CODE@ radio:radio
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_RADIO ;
LEXICON NMN_RADIO
!! * Yaml: **N-radio**
 SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-1) +Sg+Nom:
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;   !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-2)
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-3) +Sg+Ill:
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-ILL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-3) +Sg+Ill: 2025-10-29 is this correct?
 SG-LOC ;	    !!= * @CODE@ ()
 SG-COM_IN ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-4)
 ESS/PAR ; 	    !!= * @CODE@ ()
 PL-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-2) +Pl+Nom:
 PL-OBL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-4) +Pl+Gen: 
!FIX-DIM
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

!LEXICON N_OULU !!= * @CODE@ oulu:oulu
!!! inflection_type="?"
!: NMN_OULU ;
LEXICON NMN_OULU
!! * Yaml: **N-oulu**
 SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-1) +Sg+Nom:
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;   !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-2)
:%^1VOW%^V2VVʹje SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-3) +Sg+Ill:
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG: SG-ILL ;   !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-3) +Sg+Ill:
 SG-LOC ;	    !!= * @CODE@ ()
 SG-COM_IN ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-4)
 ESS/PAR ; 	    !!= * @CODE@ ()
 PL-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-2) +Pl+Nom:
 PL-OBL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-4) +Pl+Gen: 
!FIX-DIM
 VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX ;

LEXICON N_CHEE !!= * @CODE@ čee:čẹẹ
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_CHEE ;
LEXICON NMN_CHEE
!! * Yaml: **N-chee**
: SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
:i SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
 SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;   !!= * @CODE@ 
:ʹe SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
 SG-LOC ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
 SG-COM_IN ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
 ESS/PAR ; 	    !!= * @CODE@ 
 PL-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-2) +Pl+Nom:
 PL-OBL ;	    !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-4) +Pl+Gen: 
!FIX-DIM

!LEXICON N_HYPOTEEQS !!= * @CODE@ hypoteeʹs:hypotẹẹs
!!! inflection_type="?"
!: NMN_HYPOTEEQS ;
!LEXICON NMN_HYPOTEEQS
!! * Yaml: **N-hypotees**
!:%^PAL SG-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@  +Sg+Nom:
!:%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;   !!= * @CODE@ 
!: E-STEM_SG-ILL ;	    !!= * @CODE@  +Sg+Ill:
!:%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
!:%^PAL SG-COM_IN ;	    !!= * @CODE@ 
!:%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; 	    !!= * @CODE@ 
!:%^PAL PL-NOM ;	    !!= * @CODE@  +Pl+Nom:
!:%^PAL PL-OBL ;	    !!= * @CODE@  +Pl+Gen: 
!FIX-DIM

LEXICON N_ENERGII !!= * @CODE@ energii:energi
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_ENERGII ;
LEXICON NMN_ENERGII
!! * Yaml: **N-energii**
!! THIS NEEDS CHECKING
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i SG-NOM ;           !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-1) +Sg+Nom: energii
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i SG-ABE/ACC/GEN	    ;   !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-2)
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ia SG-ILL ;	        !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-3) +Sg+Ill: energiia
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i SG-LOC ;	    !!= * @CODE@ ()
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i SG-COM_N ;        !!= * @CODE@ (=TSA-4)
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i ESS/PAR ;          !!= * @CODE@ ()
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i PL-NOM ;           !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-2) +Pl+Nom: energii
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:i PL-OBL ;           !!= * @CODE@ (TSA-4) +Pl+Gen:
!FIX-DIM
!:a N_BIOLOGIA ; Loop closed 20250912, thanks Flammie
! do not point substandard to standard. Generate substandard FROM standard. (this should be a research question!)

:i A_DER/LAZH ;



!LEXICON N_OBL
!+N+Sg+Gen: K ;
!+N+Sg+Acc: K ;
!+N+Sg+Ill:%>a K ;
!+N+Sg+Loc:%>est K ;
!+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;
!+N+Ess:%>en K ; ! ess and prt without
!+N+Par:%>ed K ;
!+N+Sg+Abe:%>tää K ;

!+N+Pl+Nom: K ;
!+N+Pl+Gen:%>i K ;
!+N+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;
!+N+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;
!+N+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;
!+N+Pl+Com:%>ivuiʹm K ;
!+N+Pl+Abe:%>itää K ;

LEXICON N_NALLSHEM !!= * @CODE@ čââʹlmteʹm:čââʹlmtẹ%^1VOWm
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_NALLSHEM ;
LEXICON NMN_NALLSHEM
!! 292-295
!! * Yaml: **A-chaalmtem**
!!NumContLex="650"
+Use/NGminip:%^PAL SG-NOM ;
:%^PALE SG-NOM ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:{XC}%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL SG-COM_IN ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; ! CHECKME
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-OBL ;

:{XC}%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITH-PAL ;
:%^PAL E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; ! hoʹzjeʹnstan
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; ! hoʹzjeeʹnstan
:%^V2VV E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITHOUT-PAL ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITH-PAL ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITH-PAL_PL-OBL ;
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;
:{XC}%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITHOUT-PAL ;


LEXICON N_HOQZJEQN !!= * @CODE@ čââʹlmteʹm:čââʹlmtẹ%^1VOWm
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_HOQZJEQN ;
LEXICON NMN_HOQZJEQN
!! 292-295
!! * Yaml: **A-chaalmtem**
!!NumContLex="650"
:%^PALE SG-NOM ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^PAL SG-NOM ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:{XC}%^C2CC%>a SG-ILL ; ! hoʹzjenna
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e SG-LOC ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL SG-COM_IN ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL%>e ESS/PAR ; ! CHECKME
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-NOM ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL PL-OBL ;

:{XC}%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITHOUT-PAL ;
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-RETAIN-WITH-PAL ;
:%^PAL E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; ! hoʹzjeʹnstan
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; ! hoʹzjeeʹnstan
:%^V2VV E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITHOUT-PAL ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITH-PAL ;
:%^V2VV%^PAL E-STEM-PX-WEAKEN-WITH-PAL_PL-OBL ;
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITH-PAL ;
:{XC}%^C2CC E-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-WITHOUT-PAL ;


!! ## Stem types from the grammar

!! *These are still not fixed.*
LEXICON N_TUEJJEEJA !!= * @CODE@ tuejjeeja:tuejjẹẹja
!!! inflection_type="?"
: NMN_TUEJJEEJA ;
LEXICON NMN_TUEJJEEJA !!= * @CODE@ tuejjeeja:tuejjẹẹja
!! tuejjeeja:tuejjẹẹja
!! * Yaml: **N-tuejjeeja**
: SG-NOM ;
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
: SG-ILL ; ! http://www.giella.org/articles/pljmyBHCF2kUsUqu8GG6s
: SG-LOC ;
: SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
: ESS/PAR ; 
!+Der+Der/Dimin+N: N_KUYLAZH ; FIXME 2018-10-13



LEXICON N_PRSPRC-EEI !!= * @CODE@ tuõđšteei:tuõđštee
!!! inflection_type="?"
+NomAg: NMN_PRSPRC-EEI ;
LEXICON NMN_PRSPRC-EEI !!= * @CODE@ tuõđšteei:tuõđštee
!! tuõđšteei:tuõđštee
!! * Yaml: **N-tuodhshteei**
+Use/NG:ʹjj SG-NOM ;
:i SG-NOM ;
!+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:ʹj SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
+Use/NG:ʹj SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
:i SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
:j%^VV2V%>ja SG-ILL ; ! ǨK 2017-02-20 OR 2017-02-14: alttârveäʹǩǩteei (=, -veäʹǩǩtejja)
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>ja SG-ILL ;
:%>ʹje SG-LOC ;
:%>ʹj SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
:%>ʹje ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NG:%>ʹjje ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>{ʼØ}je ESS/PAR ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Err/Orth:%>{ʼØ}ja ESS/PAR ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>{ʼØ}j N_KUYLAZH ;

! I see no need for this contlex, all such words can belong to N_PRSPRC-EEI (Trond Tynnøl 2026-02-10)

! LEXICON N_PRSPRC-EEQJJ !!= * @CODE@ tuõđšteei:tueʹjjee
! !!! inflection_type="?"
! +NomAg: NMN_PRSPRC-EEQJJ ;
! LEXICON NMN_PRSPRC-EEQJJ !!= * @CODE@ tuõđšteei:tueʹjjee
! !! tuõđšteeʹjj:tuõđštẹẹ
! !! * Yaml: **N-tuodhshteeqjj**
! :ʹjj SG-NOM ;
! :ʹj SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;
! :%^VV2V%>jja SG-ILL ; ! ǨK 2017-02-20
! :%>ʹje SG-LOC ;
! :%>ʹj SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;
! :%>ʹjje ESS/PAR ; !     CHECKME 2017-02-01
! +Der+Der/Dimin+N:%>{ʼØ}j N_KUYLAZH ;




!! Class 5 according to Feist 152
!! ## k-stems

LEXICON N_5Y_VS_VVZZ !!aŋkerias:aŋkeria%^1VOW{ʹØ}s
 NMN_5Y_VS_VVZZ ;
LEXICON NMN_5Y_VS_VVZZ
! gradation: yes
!! stemtype
!! * Yaml: **N-sajos**
: SG-NOM ;
+Err/Orth:%>â ESS/PAR ; !2024-07-17 error
:{XC}%^C2CC%>â ESS/PAR ;
!! Sajos:Sajo%^1VOW{ʹØ}s
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ;
:{XC}%^PAL%^C2CC%>e SG-ILL ;
+Err/Orth-no-q:{XC}%^C2CC%>e SG-ILL ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG%>â SG-LOC ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG%> SG-COM_IN ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG PL-NOM ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG PL-OBL ;
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG N_KUUZZYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuzz-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:{XC}%^V2VV%^PAL%^K2GG N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL ;  !!= * @CODE@ kuuʹzz-
+Der+Der/Dimin+N:%^PAL%^KK2GAllegro N_KUUZZYZH-WITH-PAL-ALLEGRO ;

! CHECKPX 2015-10-20
:{XC}%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN ;
:{XC}%^V2VV%^K2GG HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_LARGO ;
:%^K2GAllegro SG-LOC-PX_ALLEGRO ;
:{XC}%^C2CC HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;

! HatY-STEM-PX-RETAIN_PL ;
! HatY-STEM-PX-WEAKEN_PL ;
! HatY-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN-ESS ;


LEXICON N_5Y_VK_VVGG
 NMN_5Y_VK_VVGG ;
LEXICON N_SAJOS
!!! inflection_type="?"
!: NMN_SAJOS ;
 NMN_5Y_VK_VVGG ;!almost jokk_jooǥǥ
LEXICON NMN_SAJOS
 NMN_5Y_VK_VVGG ;
